Colorado statutes. TITLE 16 Criminal Proceedings
ARTICLE 15.7
CRIME STOPPER ORGANIZATIONS

Section

16-15.7-101. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds that a significant number of criminal offenders remain at large in this state because law enforcement agencies often lack information concerning criminal activity. In many instances private citizens have information that, if known to law enforcement agencies, would lead to the detection and apprehension of such offenders. Private, nonprofit crime stopper organizations that offer rewards for such information have been successful at encouraging some citizens to come forward; however, even with the offer of a reward, many citizens do not come forward because they fear involvement and shun publicity. In order to remedy this situation and to increase the effectiveness of crime stopper organizations, the general assembly finds and declares that it is appropriate to provide for the anonymity of any person who provides information concerning criminal activity to a crime stopper organization and to provide for the confidentiality of crime stopper organization records.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire article added, p. 1808, § 1, effective June 1.

16-15.7-102. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Crime stopper organization" means a private, nonprofit organization:

Whose primary purposes are to accept donations for the payment of rewards to persons who provide information concerning criminal activity and to forward such information to appropriate law enforcement agencies;

Is subject to the provisions of articles 121 to 137 of title 7, C.R.S.;

Is held to be tax exempt by the United States internal revenue service; and

Has complied with the requirements of section 16-15.7-103.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire article added, p. 1808, § 1, effective June 1.

L. 97:

(1)(b) amended, p. 763, § 32, effective July 1, 1998.

16-15.7-103. Requirements for articles of incorporation of crime stopper organizations.

In addition to any other requirements for articles of incorporation imposed by articles 121 to 137 of title 7, C.R.S., the articles of incorporation for any crime stopper organization that elects to avail itself of the confidentiality provisions of this article shall provide that the organization shall:

Establish a method to ensure that the identity of any person who provides information concerning criminal activity to the organization remains unknown to all persons and entities, including officers and employees of the organization;

Establish a method to ensure that if the identity of any person who provides information becomes known to the crime stopper organization, whether through voluntary disclosure or by any other means, such identity is not further disclosed;

Assist law enforcement agencies in the detection of crime and apprehension of criminal offenders by promptly forwarding information received concerning criminal acts to such agencies;

Foster the detection of crime and encourage citizens to report information about criminal activity; and

Encourage news and other media to promote local crime stopper organizations by informing the public of the functions and benefits of the organization.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire article added, p. 1809, § 1, effective June 1.

L. 97:

IP(1) amended, p. 763, § 33, effective July 1, 1998.

16-15.7-104. In camera review - confidentiality - records and information - criminal penalty.

A crime stopper organization may not be compelled to produce records concerning a report of criminal activity before a court or other tribunal except on the motion of a criminal defendant to the court in which the offense is being tried that the records or report contain impeachment evidence or evidence that is exculpatory to the defendant in the trial of that offense.

On motion of a defendant pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (1), the court may subpoena the records or report. The court shall conduct an ex parte in camera inspection of materials produced under subpoena to determine whether the materials contain impeachment evidence or evidence that is exculpatory to the defendant.

If the court determines that the materials produced contain impeachment evidence or evidence that is exculpatory to the defendant, the court shall present the evidence to the defendant. In the event the materials contain information which would identify the person who was the source of the evidence, the court shall ensure that such identity is not disclosed, unless the state or federal constitution requires the disclosure of that person's identity. The court shall execute an affidavit accompanying the disclosed materials swearing that, in the opinion of the court, the materials disclosed represent the impeachment or exculpatory evidence the defendant is entitled to receive under this section.

The court shall return to the crime stoppers organization all materials produced under this subsection (1) which are not disclosed to the defendant. The crime stoppers organization shall retain such materials until the conclusion of the criminal trial and the expiration of the time for all direct appeals in the case.

Records and information of a crime stopper organization concerning criminal acts are confidential, and no person shall disclose such records or information. A crime stopper organization shall only be compelled to produce such records or information before a court or other tribunal pursuant to court order for an in camera review. Any such review shall be limited to an inspection of records and information which are relevant to the specific case pending before the court.

Any person who knowingly or intentionally discloses confidential records or information in violation of the provisions of this subsection (2) commits a class 1 misdemeanor and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-501, C.R.S. Any criminal prosecution brought pursuant to the provisions of this subsection (2) shall be brought within five years after the date the violation occurred.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire article added, p. 1809, § 1, effective June 1.

L. 2002:

(2)(b) amended, p. 1498, § 153, effective October 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending subsection (2)(b), see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.